pt-BR: Tipo de exibição do relógio: Analógico; Analógico-digital; Digital; Flip; Projeção; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de mostrador do relógio: Analógico; Analógico-digital; Digital; Reversível; Projeção; Outro
bg-BG: Тип дисплей на часовника: Аналогов; Аналогов и дигитален; Дигитален; Обръщащ се; Прожекционен; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta prikaza sata: Analogni; Anologno-digitalni; Digitalni; Preklopna; Projekcija; Ostalo
ko: 시계 표시 유형: 아날로그; 아날로그-디지털; 디지털; 플립; 프로젝션; 기타
cs: Způsob zobrazení hodin: Analogové; Analogové a digitální; Digitální; Překlápěcí; Projekce; Jiné
es: Tipo de pantalla del reloj: Analógico; Analógico-digital; Digital; Abatible; Proyección; Otros
sv: Klockvisningstyp: Analog; Analog-digital; Digital; Flip; Projektion; Övrigt
zh-CN: 钟表显示类型: 指针式; 指针-数字式; 数字式; 翻页式; 投影; 其他
ja: 時計表示タイプ: アナログ; アナログデジタル; デジタル; フリップ; プロジェクション; その他
lt-LT: Laikrodžio ekrano tipas: Analoginis; Analoginis-skaitmeninis; Skaitmeninis; Atlenkiamas; Projekcija; Kita
fr: Type d’affichage de l’horloge: Analogique; Analogique/numérique; Numérique; À clapet; Projection; Autre
pl: Typ wyświetlacza zegara: Analogowy; Analogowo-cyfrowy; Cyfrowy; Klapkowy; Wyświetlacz projekcyjny; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Typ zobrazenia hodín: Analógový; Analógovo-digitálny; Digitálny; Vyklápací; Projekcia; Iné
th: ประเภทการแสดงเวลา: อนาล็อก; อนาล็อก-ดิจิทัล; ดิจิทัล; ฝาพับ; แบบฉายภาพ; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип отображения времени: Аналоговый; Аналого-цифровой; Цифровой; Перекидной; Проекция; Другой
vi: Loại hiển thị đồng hồ: Analog; Analog - Kỹ thuật số; Kỹ thuật số; Lật; Máy chiếu; Khác
fi: Kellon näyttötyyppi: Analoginen; Analoginen-digitaalinen; Digitaalinen; Kääntöläppä; Heijastus; Muu
nl: Type klokweergave: Analoog; Analoog-digitaal; Digitaal; Flip; Projectie; Overig
zh-TW: 時鐘顯示類型: 類比; 類比加數位; 數位; 翻折式; 投影; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de afișaj al ceasului: Analogic; Analog-digital; Digital; Rabatabil; Proiecție; Altele
tr: Saat ekranı türü: Analog; Analog-Dijital; Dijital; Flip; Projeksiyonlu; Diğer
hu: Óra kijelzőtípusa: Analóg; Analóg–digitális; Digitális; Kinyitható; Kinyúló; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta prikaza ure: Analogno; Analogno-digitalno; Digitalno; Flip; Projekcija; Druga
it: Tipo di display dell'orologio: Analog; Analogico-digitale; Digitale; Flip; Proiezione; Altro
de: Uhranzeigetyp: Analog; Analog-digital; Digital; Flip; Projektion; Sonstiges
el: Τύπος οθόνης ρολογιού: Αναλογικό; Αναλογικό-ψηφιακό; Ψηφιακή; Flip; Προβολή; Άλλο
nb: Klokkevisningstype: Analog; Analog-digital; Digital; Flipp; Projeksjon; Annet
en: Clock display type: Analog; Analog-digital; Digital; Flip; Projection; Other
da: Urskivetype: Analog; Analog-digital; Digital; Flip; Projektion; Andet